Tennessee, session 114, HB2218.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 13-7-106(b), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
( ) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, a person must reside in the county
at least twelve (12) months prior to being eligible to be appointed to the board of zoning
appeals.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2218
010567
- 1 -